Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Weapons Offenses

Cross references. —

As to simple assault, see §

6-2-501

.

As to aggravated assault and battery, see §

6-2-502

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility, 68 ALR4th 507.

Fact that gun was broken, dismantled or inoperable as affecting criminal responsibility under weapons statute, 81 ALR4th 745.

What constitutes actual or constructive possession of unregistered or otherwise prohibited firearm in violation of 26 USCS § 5861, 133 ALR Fed 347.

§ 6-8-101.
Use of firearm while committing felony; subsequent convictions; penalties; applicability of provisions.

A person who uses a firearm while committing a felony shall be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years in addition to the punishment for the felony. For a second or subsequent conviction under this section a person shall be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years in addition to the punishment for the felony.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to those felonies which include as an element of the crime the use or possession of a deadly weapon.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Double jeopardy. —

Even though the offense of use of a firearm while committing a felony has different elements than the offense of attempted second-degree murder, and the state was entitled to charge defendant with both offenses, where the jury convicted defendant on both offenses, the charges merged and only one sentence should have been imposed. Bilderback v. State, 13 P.3d 249,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 218

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. Dec. 5, 2000), modified,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. Dec. 15, 2000), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

“Use.” —

Entire tenor of the supplemental jury instruction indicated that the “use” contemplated by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-8-101

had to be in the context of actually facilitating the crime; the record was clear that defendant “used” the gun in accordance with both the general meaning of the term and the “active employment” definition.
Daves v. State, 2011 WY 47, 249 P.3d 250,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited

in

Beck v. State, 2005 WY 56, 110 P.3d 898,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(2005); Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “use” of firearm for purposes of 18 USC § 924(c)(1), providing penalty for use of firearm during drug trafficking crime or crime of violence, 125 ALR Fed 545.

§ 6-8-102.
Use or possession of firearm by person convicted of certain felony offenses; penalties; exception.

Any person who has previously pleaded guilty to or been convicted of committing or attempting to commit a violent felony or a felony under W.S. 6-5-204(b), and has not been pardoned and who uses or knowingly possesses any firearm is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

As used in this section “firearm” does not include an “antique firearm” as defined in W.S. 6-8-403(a)(viii).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1993, ch. 64, § 1; 2017 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the designation (a) and added (b).

Section held legitimate exercise of state police power. —

Former similar section, which had for its purpose the prevention of the use of firearms in connection with violent crimes, was a legitimate exercise of the police power of the state and was not unreasonable. Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982).

And not unconstitutionally vague. —

Former statute was not unconstitutionally vague since, in order for there to be an unlawful possession of a firearm by a convicted felon, the accused had to know that he had possession of the firearm. Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982).

In a case in which defendant, a violent felon, was convicted of unlawful possession of a firearm in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-8-102

, defendant failed to provide even one situation where the application of the statute was uncertain, much less that it was vague in all of its applications, as he was required to do.
Harris v. State, 2006 WY 76, 137 P.3d 124,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2006).

Knowledge of status as a convicted felon. —

A defendant need not know his specific status as a convicted felon when pleading guilty to being a felon in possession of a firearm;
the factual basis provided by defendant and the State adequately supported findings that defendant knowingly possessed a firearm and that he was a convicted felon who had not been pardoned therefore, a sufficient factual basis existed for his plea of guilty.
Poole v. State, 2007 WY 33, 152 P.3d 412,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2007).

“Possession,” for purposes of section, is physical control or custody of weapon,

or immediate access to it. Additionally, any such possession of a weapon by persons convicted of violent felonies must be knowing to be unlawful. McInturff v. State, 808 P.2d 190,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1991).

Definition of firearm. —

Muzzle-loading black powder rifle that was purchased by defendant, who was a violent felon, fell within the definition of “firearm” as contemplated by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-8-102

. The statute, by its plain terms, prohibited an unpardoned violent felon from possessing any firearm.
Harris v. State, 2006 WY 76, 137 P.3d 124,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2006).

Effect of setting aside prior felony conviction. —

Although the defendant's felony conviction was set aside and the accusations or information dismissed pursuant to California's § 1203.4 (completion of probation), that did not preclude its use against the defendant. The grace extended to the defendant by the state of California did not go so far as to extinguish his conviction for all purposes. Since the California felony existed for purposes of this section, there existed no plausible reason for the defendant to withdraw his guilty plea. Reay v. State, 800 P.2d 499,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1990).

Not error to fail to instruct jury that firearm operability essential element of offense. —

Absent the introduction of some evidence that the firearm in question was inoperable, it was not error to fail to instruct the jury that operability is an essential element of the offense of being a felon in possession of a firearm. Benson v. State, 640 P.2d 83,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 456 U.S. 1006, 102 S. Ct. 2297, 73 L. Ed. 2d 1301, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 2339 (U.S. 1982).

Sentence not abuse of discretion. —

A sentence of not less than two nor more than three years imposed upon the defendant, who had a problem with alcohol, which was involved in his prior convictions and in the case at hand, was not an abuse of discretion, although two character witnesses testified that they believed that the defendant was a good person and that he posed no danger to the public. Aldrich v. State, 706 P.2d 271,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 567

(Wyo. 1985).

Applied in

Broussard v. State, 2017 WY 73, 396 P.3d 1016,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

Small v. State, 623 P.2d 1200,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 295

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of using single prior felony conviction as basis for offense of possessing weapon by convicted felon and to enhance sentence, 37 ALR4th 1168.

Sufficiency of evidence as to nature of firearm in prosecution under state statute prohibiting persons under indictment for, or convicted of, crime from acquiring, having, carrying or using firearms, 37 ALR4th 1179.

Fact that weapon was acquired for self-defense or to prevent its use against defendant as defense in prosecution for violation of state statute prohibiting persons under indictment for, or convicted of, crime from acquiring, having, carrying or using firearms or weapons, 39 ALR4th 967.

Sufficiency of prior conviction to support prosecution under state statute prohibiting persons under indictment for, or convicted of, crime from acquiring, having, carrying or using firearms or weapons, 39 ALR4th 983.

What amounts to “control” under state statute making it illegal for felon to have possession or control of firearm or other dangerous weapon, 66 ALR4th 1240.

What constitutes “constructive possession” of unregistered or otherwise prohibited weapon under state law, 88 ALR5th 121.

Receipt, possession or transportation of multiple firearms as single or multiple offense under 18 USC Appx § 1202(a)(1) [Repealed], making it federal offense for convicted felon to receive, possess or transport any firearm, 62 ALR Fed 829.

What constitutes receipt of firearm, under 18 USC § 922(h), prohibiting certain persons from receiving any firearm which has been shipped or transported in interstate or foreign commerce, 74 ALR Fed 486.

State restoration of federal felon's civil rights as nullification of conviction under 18 USCS § 921(a)(20) which defines conviction for purposes of penalizing possession of weapon by convicted felon pursuant to 18 USCS § 922(g)(1), 117 ALR Fed 247.

§ 6-8-103.
Possession, manufacture or disposition of deadly weapon with unlawful intent; penalties.

A person who knowingly possesses, manufactures, transports, repairs or sells a deadly weapon with intent to unlawfully threaten the life or physical well-being of another or to commit assault or inflict bodily injury on another is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “deadly weapon,” see §

6-1-104

.

Sufficiency of evidence. —

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of possession of deadly weapon with intent to unlawfully threaten, where he was angry over dismissal of his civil case against city attorney, he intentionally armed himself for his trip to city attorney's office, and he served assistant city attorney with a “Declaration of War” while resting his hand on stock of Uzi-type semiautomatic pistol strapped to his shoulder. Taylor v. State, 7 P.3d 15,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Harries v. State, 650 P.2d 273,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1982); Lansing v. State, 669 P.2d 923,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1983); Ventling v. State, 676 P.2d 573,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Jackson v. State, 2009 WY 82, 209 P.3d 897,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 19, 2009); Winsted v. State, 2010 WY 139, 241 P.3d 497,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Oct. 26, 2010).

Cited

in

Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008); Cohen v. State, 2008 WY 78,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(July 14, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Forfeiture of weapon unlawfully carried, before trial of individual offender, 3 ALR2d 738.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility for carrying weapon, 79 ALR2d 1412.

Validity and construction of regulations governing carrying, possession or use of tear gas or similar chemical weapons, 30 ALR3d 1416.

Admissibility in criminal case, of results of residue detection test to determine whether accused or victim handled or fired gun, 1 ALR4th 1072.

What constitutes a “bludgeon,” “blackjack,” or “billy” within meaning of criminal possession statute, 11 ALR4th 1272.

Validity of state statute proscribing possession or carrying of knife, 47 ALR4th 651.

What constitutes “constructive possession” of unregistered or otherwise prohibited weapon under state law, 88 ALR5th 121.

Cigarette lighter as deadly or dangerous weapon, 22 A.L.R.6th 533.